Hawaii statutes.
[§10-20] Taro security;
funding. (a) The office may seek available federal, state, county, or
private funding to restore taro and lo‘i cultivation. The office shall
cooperate with other public and private agencies, as appropriate, in applying
for funds pursuant to this section.

(b) The office may use and distribute funds
received pursuant to subsection (a) for projects that use taro for:

(1) Flood control;

(2) Wetland restoration and preservation;

(3) Food security;

(4) Community economic development;

(5) Job creation;

(6) Education; and

(7) Water-quality protection. [L 2010, c 196, §2]

Cross References

Hand-pounded poi, see §321-4.7.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next